Florida, session 2026, SB706.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of 28 section 332.0075, Florida Statutes, and subsection (7) is added 29 to that section, to read: 30 332.0075âCommercial service airports; transparency and 31 accountability; penalty.â 32 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 33 (e)ââMajor commercial service airportâ means an airport 34 providing commercial service which is a medium or large hub 35 airport under the classification criteria established by the 36 Federal Aviation Administration. 37 (7)(a)âThe naming of major commercial service airports is 38 preempted to the state. 39 (b)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, the major 40 commercial service airports are named as follows: 41 1.âThe airport located at One Jeff Fuqua Boulevard in 42 Orlando, or nearest thereto, is the âOrlando International 43 Airport.â 44 2.âThe airport located at 2100 NW 42nd Avenue in Miami, or 45 nearest thereto, is the âMiami International Airport.â 46 3.âThe airport located at 100 Terminal Drive in Fort 47 Lauderdale, or nearest thereto, is the âFort Lauderdale 48 Hollywood International Airport.â 49 4.âThe airport located at 4100 George J. Bean Parkway in 50 Tampa, or nearest thereto, is the âTampa International Airport.â 51 5.âThe airport located at 11000 Terminal Access Road in 52 Fort Myers, or nearest thereto, is the âSouthwest Florida 53 International Airport.â 54 6.âThe airport located at 1000 James L Turnage Boulevard in 55 West Palm Beach, or nearest thereto, currently known as the 56 âPalm Beach International Airport,â shall be renamed as the 57 âPresident Donald J. Trump International Airport,â subject to 58 approval of the Federal Aviation Administration and execution of 59 an agreement with the rights holder authorizing the commercial 60 use of âPresident Donald J. Trump International Airportâ by Palm 61 Beach County, which must, at a minimum, grant Palm Beach County 62 the perpetual and unrestricted right to use the name âPresident 63 Donald J. Trump International Airport,â as well as reasonable 64 abbreviations or nonmaterial deviations thereof, at no cost, in 65 signage, advertising, marketing, merchandising, and promotions 66 and for the branding of the airport and its operations, 67 services, and amenities, and all related purposes. 68 7.âThe airport located at 2400 Yankee Clipper Drive in 69 Jacksonville, or nearest thereto, is the âJacksonville 70 International Airport.â 71 (c)âIf an airport listed in paragraph (b) no longer meets 72 the classification criteria to be a major commercial service 73 airport, the airport name continues to be valid. 74 (d)âThe department shall review paragraph (b) annually to 75 identify airports that may be added to or removed from paragraph 76 (b) based on any change in status as a major commercial service 77 airport. If the department identifies any such airport, it must 78 notify the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House 79 of Representatives 60 days before the next regular legislative 80 session. The notice must include the name of the airport and 81 specify the reasons for the airportâs change in status. 82 (e)âGovernment records created on or after July 1, 2026, 83 which refer to airports listed in paragraph (b) must use the 84 airport names provided in paragraph (b). For purposes of this 85 subsection, airport names are branding designations only and may 86 not be construed to create or require the creation of a new 87 legal entity. This paragraph does not require a political 88 subdivision to amend any existing agreement with any person or 89 entity solely to update references to the airport name or 90 require a political subdivision to contract in the name of the 91 airport listed in paragraph (b). 92 (f)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âpolitical 93 subdivisionâ means a political subdivision as defined in s. 94 333.01 which owns and controls an airport listed in paragraph 95 (b). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a political 96 subdivision may not be construed to be in violation of any state 97 law, including, but not limited to, chapter 495 and s. 540.08, 98 for using the airport name provided in paragraph (b). 99 (g)âA political subdivision is in compliance with this 100 subsection if it diligently pursues all necessary approvals and 101 agreements to implement an airport name change required under 102 this subsection and timely commences signage and branding 103 changes upon receipt of such approvals. For purposes of this 104 paragraph, the term âtimely commencesâ means to initiate 105 planning, procurement, and implementation within a reasonable 106 period after receiving all necessary approvals, taking into 107 account the availability of budgeted funds and the timeframes 108 necessary to comply with applicable procurement laws, 109 regulations, and procedures. 110 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.